Mississippi, session 2026, HB649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Public Safety Recruitment and Retention Act". SECTION 2.  As used in this act, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section, unless the context of use clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Advanced emergency medical technician" means a person specially trained in an advanced life-support training program authorized by the Mississippi State Board of Health. (b)  "Board" means the Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board. (c)  "Emergency medical technician" means a person licensed under Section 41-59-1 et seq., to provide emergency medical services as an emergency medical technician-ambulance, emergency medical technician-advanced, emergency medical technician-paramedic, or emergency medical technician-nurse-paramedic and who is employed by a nonprivate entity. (d) "Firefighter" means an individual who is trained for the prevention and control of loss of life and property from fire or other emergencies, who is assigned to firefighting activity, and is required to respond to alarms and performs emergency actions at the location of a fire, hazardous materials or other emergency incident. (e)  "Institution of higher learning" means a public community or junior college, state college or state university located in Mississippi, respectively governed by the Mississippi Community College Board or the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or an approved private institution that chooses to accept any tuition award money pursuant; or an emergency medical services training entity accredited or certified by the Mississippi Department of Health. (f)  "Legal dependent" means anyone, other than a spouse, who is financially supported, lives with, and for whom the primary head of household has provided more than half of their financial support, as such term is defined by the United States Department of Education for purposes of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid. (g)  "Line of duty" means any action that public safety personnel is authorized or obligated by law, rule or regulation to perform, related to or as a condition of employment or service. (h)  "Open seat" means a vacant position in a class, course or program that is available for enrollment, and which may become available when a student drops out or transfers, or when a class, course or program has unused capacity, allowing new students to register or enroll. (i) "Paramedic" means a certified healthcare professional who specializes in providing emergency medical treatment to people who are injured or ill, typically in a setting outside of a hospital. (j)  "Law enforcement officer" means any lawfully sworn officer or employee of the state or any political subdivision of the state whose duties require the officer or employee to investigate, pursue, apprehend, arrest, transport or maintain custody of persons who are charged with, suspected of committing, or convicted of a crime, whether the officer is on regular duty on full-time status, an auxiliary or reserve officer, or is serving on a temporary or part-time status. (k)  "Public safety personnel" includes any police officer, firefighter, paramedic, telecommunicator first responder, emergency medical technician or advanced emergency medical technician who is trained and authorized by law or rule to render emergency medical assistance or treatment. (l) "Telecommunicator first responder" means any person employed as an emergency call taker or public safety dispatcher whose duties include receiving, processing or transmitting public safety information received through a 911 public safety answering point. (m) "Tuition" means the charges and cost of tuition as set by the governing body of an institution of higher education, including fees such as course fees, activity fees, technology fees and mandatory fees charged by such institution to all full- and part-time students as a condition of enrollment, but excluding the costs of room, board, books, and any other educational materials, equipment or supplies. SECTION 3. (1)  Subject to appropriation, public safety personnel with at least six (6) years of service shall be entitled to an award worth up to one hundred percent (100%) of the resident tuition charges of an institution of higher learning if the individual: (a)  Possesses one (1) of the following: (i)  A current, valid license issued by the department of health and senior services authorizing such person to serve as an emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic; (ii)  A current, valid license issued by the peace officer standards and training commission authorizing such person to serve as a peace officer; (iii)  A current, valid certificate issued by the division of fire safety authorizing such person to serve as a firefighter; (iv)  A current, valid certificate confirming successful completion of any ongoing training requirements; or (v)  For all public safety personnel, a certificate of verification signed by the individual's supervisor or employer verifying that such individual is currently employed full-time as public safety personnel and trained and authorized by law or rule to render emergency medical assistance or treatment; (b)  Meets all admission requirements of the institution of higher learning of application for enrollment; (c)  Has not already earned a baccalaureate degree; (d)  Pursues studies leading to a license or certification issued by a training entity accredited or certified by the Department of Health, an associate degree or baccalaureate degree in one (1) of the following academic subject areas: (i)  For police officers, eligible subjects include forensic science, fisheries and wildlife, political science, psychology, history, philosophy, sociology, anthropology, global studies, Spanish, journalism, advertising, public relations, nutrition and health sciences, communication sciences and disorders and criminal justice; (ii)  For firefighters, paramedics, emergency medical technicians, and advanced emergency medical technicians, eligible subjects include biology, chemistry, biochemistry, microbiology, nutrition and health sciences, communication sciences and disorders, Spanish, advertising, public relations, paramedicine, fire science, fire technology, fire administration, fire management, communications, homeland security, emergency management, disaster management and crisis management; and (iii)  For telecommunicator first responders, eligible subjects include any subject specified in subparagraphs (i) or (ii) of this paragraph; (e)  Submits verification of the professional license or certificate and the certificate of verification required by paragraph (a) of this subsection to the board, in a form and manner as prescribed by the board; (f)  Files with the board documentation showing proof of employment as public safety personnel and proof of residence in Mississippi each year the individual or the individual's legal dependent applies for and receives the tuition award; (g)  First applies for all other forms of federal and state student financial aid before applying for a tuition award, including, but not limited to, filing the United States Department of Education Free Application for Federal Student Aid and, if applicable, applying for financial assistance pursuant to the provisions of 38 USCS Section 3301, et seq.; and (h)  Submits a document to the department confirming that the public safety personnel has satisfied the provisions of paragraph (g) of this subsection, to be submitted in a form and manner as prescribed by the board. (2)  Public safety personnel may receive the tuition award pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for up to five (5) years if they otherwise continue to be eligible for the tuition award.  The five (5) years of tuition award eligibility starts once the individual applies for and receives the tuition award for the first time and is available to such individual for the next five (5) consecutive years or the individual's achievement of one hundred twenty (120) credit hours, whichever occurs first. (3)  Subject to appropriation, a legal dependent of public safety personnel with at least ten (10) years of service shall be entitled to a tuition award worth up to one hundred percent (100%) of the resident tuition charges of an institution of higher education for an associate or baccalaureate degree program if such public safety personnel satisfies the provisions of paragraphs (a), (e) and (f) of subsection (1) of this section and the legal dependent: (a)  Executes an agreement with the board committing to the following stipulations: (i)  Agrees to reside within the State of Mississippi for a period of five (5) years following the use of the tuition award; (ii)  Each year during the five-year period following use of the tuition award, the tuition award recipient agrees to file a state income tax return and provide a copy of such tax return to the board to document that such recipient still resides in the State of Mississippi; (iii)  Failure of the tuition award recipient to annually file a tax return as proof of residency in the state for the five-year period following the use of the tuition award or failure to remain a resident of Mississippi for the five-year period following the use of the tuition award, converts the tuition award to a loan to such recipient, subject to the following conditions: 1.  Interest shall be charged on the unpaid balance of the amount received from the date the recipient ceases to reside in Mississippi until the amount received is paid back to the state.  The interest rate shall be adjusted annually and shall be equal to one percentage (1%) point over the prevailing United States prime rate in effect on January first of such year; and 2.  The servicer of such loans shall be the Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board; and (iv)  Any residency, filing or payment obligation incurred by the tuition award recipient is canceled in the event of the tuition award recipient's total and permanent disability or death. (b)  Has not previously earned a baccalaureate degree; (c)  Meets all admission requirements of the institution of higher learning of application for enrollment; (d)  First applies for all other forms of federal and state student financial aid before applying for a tuition award, including, but not limited to, filing the United States Department of Education Free Application for Federal Student Aid and, if applicable, applying for financial assistance pursuant to the provisions of 38 USCS Section 3301, et seq.; (e)  Submits a document to the department confirming that the legal dependent has satisfied paragraph (d) of this subsection, to be submitted in a form and manner as prescribed by the board; (f)  Submits the verification required pursuant to Section 5 of this act to the department; and (g)  Pursues studies leading to a license or certification issued by a training entity accredited or certified by the Department of Health, an associate degree or baccalaureate degree in any one (1) of the subject areas specified in subsection (1)(d)(i), (ii) and (iii) of this section. (4)  A legal dependent may receive the tuition award for up to five (5) years if the public safety personnel and the legal dependent continue to be eligible for such tuition award.  The five (5) years of tuition award eligibility starts once the legal dependent applies for and receives the tuition award for the first time and is available to such legal dependent for the next five (5) consecutive years or the legal dependent's achievement of one hundred twenty (120) credit hours, whichever occurs first. SECTION 4. (1)  The tuition award shall be worth up to one hundred percent (100%) of the public safety personnel's or the legal dependent's tuition remaining due after subtracting awarded federal financial aid grants and state scholarships and grants for the eligible public safety personnel or legal dependent during the time the public safety personnel or legal dependent is enrolled.  To remain eligible, the public safety personnel or legal dependent shall comply with all requirements of the institution for continued attendance and award of an associate degree or a baccalaureate degree. (2)  In the case of tuition at an approved private institution, the tuition award shall be worth up to one hundred percent (100%) of the public safety personnel's or the legal dependent's tuition remaining due after subtracting awarded federal financial aid grants and state scholarships and grants for the eligible public safety personnel or legal dependent during the time the public safety personnel or legal dependent is enrolled, up to a maximum amount that is equal to the total cost of tuition and mandatory fees charged to a Mississippi resident at the public community or junior college, state college or state university with the highest combined tuition and mandatory fee cost in the state at the time a tuition grant is awarded, as determined by the board.  A private institution that chooses to accept as a tuition payment any tuition award money pursuant to this subdivision shall not charge the recipient of the tuition award any tuition that exceeds the maximum combined tuition and mandatory fee cost as determined by the board prior to the application of the tuition award. SECTION 5. (1)  An application for a tuition award shall include a verification of the public safety personnel's satisfaction of the requirements of Section 3(1)(a),(e) and (f) of this act.  The public safety personnel shall include such verification when he or she or his or her legal dependent is applying to the department for a tuition waiver. (2)  The death of public safety personnel in the line of duty which occurs after submission of an application for a tuition award shall not disqualify such individual's otherwise eligible legal dependent from receiving the tuition award.  In such case, in lieu of submitting the certificate of verification provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the legal dependent shall submit a statement attesting that: (a)  At the time of death, such public safety personnel satisfied the requirements of subsection (1) of this section; and (b)  The public safety personnel died in the line of duty. SECTION 6. The board shall provide a tuition award to public safety personnel and legal dependents who satisfy the provisions of this act, if applicable, and apply for an open seat at an institution of higher education, but shall not provide a tuition award if doing so would require the institution to create additional seats exceeding class, course or program capacity. SECTION 7. All applicants for a tuition award shall submit their applications to the board no later than December 15 annually.  No later than March 1 annually, the board shall send written notice of the applicant's eligibility or ineligibility for the tuition award and state whether the application has been approved or denied.  If the applicant is determined not to be eligible for the tuition award, the notice shall include the reason or reasons for such determination. If the application is denied, the notice shall include the reason or reasons for the denial. SECTION 8. (1)  There is created in the State Treasury the "Public Safety Recruitment and Retention Fund", which shall consist of monies appropriated by the Legislature or any gifts, donations, or bequests for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this act.  The State Treasurer shall be custodian of the fund, and may approve disbursements.  The fund shall be a dedicated fund and money in the fund shall be used solely by the Postsecondary Educational Financial Assistance Board for the purpose of granting tuition awards as provided in this act. (2)  Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, any monies remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse to the credit of the general fund.  The funds shall remain inviolate and the State Treasurer shall invest monies in the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested.  Any interest and monies earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund. SECTION 9. (1)  In any year in which monies in the public safety recruitment and retention fund are insufficient to fully fund tuition awards for all eligible applicants, tuition awards shall be awarded in the following order of priority; provided, that, in the event of a tie in eligibility, available funds shall be distributed on a pro rata basis: (a)  Priority class one shall include public safety personnel, in the following order: (i)  Public safety personnel in departments located wholly or partially in counties or cities not within a county with the highest crime rate per capita, as determined by the most recent uniform crime reporting statistics from the Federal Bureau of Investigation; and (ii)  Public safety personnel with the most years of service; and (b)  Priority class two shall include dependents of public safety personnel, in the following order: (i)  Dependents of public safety personnel in departments located wholly or partially in counties or cities not within a county with the highest crime rate per capita, as determined by the most recent uniform crime reporting statistics from the Federal Bureau of Investigation; and (ii)  Dependents of public safety personnel with the most years of service. (2) The tuition awards provided for in this act are subject to appropriation.  If there are no monies in the fund established in Section 8 of this act, no tuition awards shall be granted. SECTION 10.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.